Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-8,137
Attracting Excellence
to Teaching Program; eligible student; contract requirements; loan payments;
suspension; loan forgiveness; amount.

(1)(a) Prior
to receiving any money from a loan pursuant to the Attracting Excellence to
Teaching Program, an eligible student shall enter into a contract with the
department. Such contract shall
provide notice to the eligible student that funding for loans pursuant to
the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program terminates on June 30, 2016. Such
contract shall be exempt from the requirements of sections 73-501 to 73-510.

(b) For eligible students who applied for the first time prior
to April 23, 2009, the contract shall require that if (i) the borrower is
not employed as a teacher in Nebraska for a time period equal to the number
of years required for loan forgiveness pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section and is not enrolled as a full-time student in a graduate program within
six months after obtaining an undergraduate degree for which a loan from the
program was obtained or (ii) the borrower does not complete the requirements
for graduation within five consecutive years after receiving the initial loan
under the program, then the loan must be repaid, with interest at the rate
fixed pursuant to section 45-103 accruing as of the date the borrower signed
the contract, and an appropriate penalty as determined by the department may
be assessed. If a borrower fails to remain enrolled at an eligible institution
or otherwise fails to meet the requirements of an eligible student, repayment
of the loan shall commence within six months after such change in eligibility.
The State Board of Education may by rules and regulations provide for exceptions
to the conditions of repayment pursuant to this subdivision based upon mitigating
circumstances.

(c) For eligible students who apply for the first time on
or after April 23, 2009, the contract shall require that if (i) the borrower
is not employed as a full-time teacher teaching in an approved or accredited
school in Nebraska and teaching at least a portion of the time in the shortage
area for which the loan was received for a time period equal to the number
of years required for loan forgiveness pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section and is not enrolled as a full-time student in a graduate program within
six months after obtaining an undergraduate degree for which a loan from the
program was obtained or (ii) the borrower does not complete the requirements
for graduation within five consecutive years after receiving the initial loan
under the program, then the loan shall be repaid with interest at the rate
fixed pursuant to section 45-103 accruing as of the date the borrower signed
the contract and actual collection costs as determined by the department.
If a borrower fails to remain enrolled at an eligible institution or otherwise
fails to continue to be an eligible student, repayment of the loan shall commence
within six months after such change in eligibility. The State Board of Education
may by rule and regulation provide for exceptions to the conditions of repayment
pursuant to this subdivision based upon mitigating circumstances.

(2) If the borrower applied for the first time prior to April
23, 2009, and (a) successfully completes the teacher education program and
becomes certified pursuant to sections 79-806 to 79-815, (b) becomes employed
as a teacher in this state within six months of becoming certified, and (c)
otherwise meets the requirements of the contract, payments shall be suspended
for the number of years that the borrower is required to remain employed as
a teacher in this state under the contract. For each year that the borrower
teaches in Nebraska pursuant to the contract, payments shall be forgiven in
an amount equal to the amount borrowed for one year, except that if the borrower
teaches in a school district that is in a local system classified as very
sparse as defined in section 79-1003 or teaches in a school district in which
at least forty percent of the students are poverty students as defined in
section 79-1003, payments shall be forgiven each year in an amount equal to
the amount borrowed for two years.

(3) If the borrower applies for the first time on or after
April 23, 2009, and (a) successfully completes the teacher education program
and major for which the borrower is receiving a forgivable loan pursuant to
the program and becomes certified pursuant to sections 79-806 to 79-815 with
an endorsement in the shortage area for which the loan was received, (b) becomes
employed as a full-time teacher teaching at least a portion of the time in
the shortage area for which the loan was received in an approved or accredited
school in this state within six months of becoming certified, and (c) otherwise
meets the requirements of the contract, payments shall be suspended for the
number of years that the borrower is required to remain employed as a teacher
in this state under the contract. Beginning after the first two years of teaching
full-time in Nebraska following graduation for the degree for which the loan
was received, for each year that the borrower teaches full-time in Nebraska
pursuant to the contract, the loan shall be forgiven in an amount equal to
three thousand dollars, except that if the borrower teaches full-time in a
school district that is in a local system classified as very sparse as defined
in section 79-1003, teaches in a school building in which at least forty percent
of the formula students are poverty students as defined in section 79-1003,
or teaches in an accredited or approved private school in Nebraska in which
at least forty percent of the enrolled students qualified for free lunches
as determined by the most recent data available from the department, payments
shall be forgiven each year in an amount equal to six thousand dollars.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 20;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 22;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB547, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB858, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB497, § 4.